Hawaii statutes.
§431:10D-310 Application to term and
specified insurance. Any of the provisions required by this part or any
portion thereof which are not applicable to single premium or term policies or
to policies issued or granted pursuant to nonforfeiture provisions, shall to
that extent not be incorporated therein. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next